Arkansas, session 2025, HB1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - HOUSE STAFF. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas House of Representatives for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE EXE04
(2) CHIEF COUNSEL/PARLIAMENTARIAN 1 GRADE EXE03
(3) COORD LEGISLATIVE SERV 1 GRADE EXE01
(4) CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC08
(5) CHIEF CLERK/FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC08
(6) DIRECTOR OF MEMBER SERVICES 1 GRADE SPC08
(7) ADMIN SPECIALIST/TRAVEL COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS10
*JAR006*
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
(8) HOUSE PROPERTIES & FACILITIES MGR 1 GRADE SPC03
(9) DIRECTOR OF OPS/EXEC ADMIN TO THE SPEAKER 1 GRADE SPC08
(10) ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS09
(11) CHIEF SECURITY OFFICER/SERGEANT AT ARMS 1 GRADE LES05
(12) ASST CHIEF CLERK/ASST FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SPC02
(13) COMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST/VIDEOGRAPHER 1 GRADE IST07
(14) COMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST/PHOTOGRAPHER 1 GRADE SPC01
(15) ADMINISTRATIVE RECEPTIONIST 2 GRADE SGS06
(16) ASST HOUSE PROPERTIES & FACILITIES MGR 1 GRADE SGS04
(17) COMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST/SOUND CLERK 1 GRADE SGS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 18

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Arkansas
House of Representatives for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: seven (7) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STAFF. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
House of Representatives for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,662,250
(02) EXTRA HELP 50,000
(03) PERSONAL SERV MATCHING 449,602
(04) MAINTENANCE & GENERAL OPERATIONS 100,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,286,852

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - INSTITUTE. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from the Constitutional
Officers Fund, for payment of per diem and mileage of members and newly
elected members who attend the Institute of Legislative Procedure, House
Legislative Orientation, and any other briefing meetings held prior to the
convening of a Legislative Session of the General Assembly, the sum
of...................................................................$50,000.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for operating expenses required in
continuing the automating of the legislative process of the Arkansas House of
Representatives for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 125,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $150,000

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - MEMBER SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas House of Representatives - Member Services for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
(1) HOUSE LEGIS ANALYST/SESSION EMPLOYEE III 6 GRADE SGS10
(2) HOUSE SPECIAL PROJECTS/GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS11
(3) HOUSE LEGIS ANALYST/SESSION EMPLOYEE II 3 GRADE SGS07
(4) HOUSE LEGIS ANALYST/SESSION EMPLOYEE I 2 GRADE SGS06
(5) HOUSE LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE SECRETARY 1 GRADE SGS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 13

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - MEMBER SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Arkansas House of Representatives - Member Services for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $969,285
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000
(03) PERSONAL SERV MATCHING 271,399
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,275,684

SECTION 8. REGULAR SALARIES - SUPPLEMENTAL STAFFING. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas House of Representatives Supplemental Staffing
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) HOUSE LEGISLATIVE ANALYST II 5 GRADE SGS07
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
(2) HOUSE LEGISLATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE SGS06
(3) MANAGEMENT PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE SGS05
(4) HOUSE LEGIS COMMITTEE SECRETARY 5 GRADE SGS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 13

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - SUPPLEMENTAL STAFFING. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Arkansas House of Representatives - Supplemental Staffing for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $670,000
(02) PERSONAL SERV MATCHING 174,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $844,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - HOUSE SELECT COMMITTEE EXPENSES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be payable
from the State Central Services Fund, for paying per diem, expenses and
mileage to members of the House of Representatives attending regular and
special meetings and other committee related activities of the House Select
Committees for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PER DIEM, EXPENSES AND MILEAGE FOR
MEMBERS OF HOUSE SELECT COMMITTEES $50,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - REAPPROPRIATION - CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICERS
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas House of
Representatives, to be payable from the Constitutional Officers Fund, for the
balance remaining on June 30, 2025, in the appropriations enacted to defray
any necessary expenses of the House of Representatives of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly, Section 2 of Act 1 of 2024, Sections 4 and 11 of Act 43 of
2024, and HB1001 as introduced in the 2025 Regular Session, there to be used
for the same purposes of the Arkansas House of Representatives of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly, of the Arkansas House of Representatives for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of......................$2,050,000.

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - REAPPROPRIATION - STATE CENTRAL SERVICES.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas House of Representatives, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for the balance remaining on
June 30, 2025 in the appropriations enacted to defray any necessary expenses
of the House of Representatives of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly,
Sections 3, 5, 7, 9, 10 and 12 of Act 43 of 2024, there to be used for the
same purposes of the Arkansas House of Representatives of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly, the sum in the aggregate not to exceed..........$2,025,000.

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. USES OF
FUNDS. The funds appropriated in this Act shall be used to defray the
necessary expenses of the operation of the Office of the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, the Office of the Chief of Staff, the Office of the
Coordinator of House Legislative Services, the Office of Parliamentarian, the
Chief Clerk's Office, House Member Services Office and other reasonable and
necessary expenses of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly
incurred during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026. Any balance
remaining on June 30, 2024 2025 in the funds provided by this Act shall be
made available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026 and for the same
purposes.

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
AUTHORITY. If the Speaker of the House and the Chief of Staff or his
designee determine that any item or portion thereof appropriation herein for
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
a specific purpose is not needed for such purpose, they may certify such fact
to the State Auditor and the State Auditor shall cause a transfer to be made
from one item to another between any appropriations authorized by the General
Assembly for the House of Representatives.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARIES.
In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and
retained, the House of Representatives may exceed the maximum salary levels
by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the
positions authorized in their operation appropriation act, may exceed the
maximum salary levels for the purpose of merit adjustments for all positions,
and may promote a maximum of two grades for no more than one-third (1/3) of
the classified positions authorized in its operation appropriation act.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
AUDIO/VISUAL POLICY. The appropriations provided herein to produce audio or
video materials by or under the direction of the House of Representatives
shall not be used for the following:
(a) A person may not use audio or video materials produced by or under the
direction of the House of Representatives in political or campaign
advertising.
(b) A person may not use audio or video materials produced by or under
the direction of the House of Representatives for a commercial purpose.
(1) In this section, "commercial purpose" means a purpose that
is intended to result in a profit or other tangible benefit.
(c) The House Management Committee may give permission to an entity to
use the audio or video materials for public education governmental
broadcast which shall not conflict with subsection (b).

SECTION 17. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1003
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 18. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 19. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/House Management









04-03-2025 11:44:10 JAR006